Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Chapter 05. Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Act.

Revisor’s notes. —

Under § 5, ch. 158, SLA 1978, references in this chapter to the Department of Natural Resources have been changed to Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, except in AS

31.05.026

.

Under Administrative Order 124, effective July 1, 1991, the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission was transferred from the Department of Commerce and Economic Development to the Department of Natural Resources for administrative purposes. Under Administrative Order 142, effective February 17, 1994, the commission was transferred from the Department of Natural Resources to the Department of Administration.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska oil and gas conservation commission, see 20 AAC 25.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This chapter, which mandates the conservation of oil and gas and prohibits their waste, would not be contravened by a local coastal management plan which comports with the Alaska Coastal Management Program.
May 12, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.